src-fst-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# SKOLT SAAMI PROPERNOUN MORPHOLOGY 

THE LEXICON *`OUTSIDE_LEXICONS`* ASSIGNS THE TAG +Attr

* LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  toobdâlm:toobdâlm

like KÕÕNJÂL 
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-kidd, N-soll, N-toll, N-vorr**
strong_geminate, short_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel 
:%>â ESS ;    		  = * LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  tollân
strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
single_consonant, long_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	= * LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  tool
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;               = * LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  toolin
:%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-OBL ;	                = * LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  tooli, toolid, toolid, toolin, toolivuiʹm, toolitaa

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-kuss**

R ;		= * LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  kuss
:%>â ESS ;     		 = * LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM  kussân

* LEXICON PROP_VUYSPPOAQD  vuâsppåʹd:vuâsppå%^1VOWd

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
